Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1236.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 402(c) of the act of June 22, 1937 (P.L.1987, No.394), known as The Clean Streams Law, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 402. Potential Pollution.--* * *(c) * * *(3) A construction site with construction activities that 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 result in land disturbance of more than one acre and less than five acres may apply to the department to waive the otherwise applicable requirements for a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit in accordance with 40 CFR 122.26(b) (15)(i) (relating to storm water discharges (applicable to State NPDES programs, see § 123.25)). If the construction site satisfies the criteria necessary for a waiver in accordance with 40 CFR 122.26(b)(15)(i), the department shall grant the waiver.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1236PN1547 - 2 - 123456789